Utah statutes.
9-4-305.   Duties -- Loans -- Interest.
(1)  The impact board shall:
(a)  make grants and loans from the amounts appropriated by the Legislature
out of the impact fund to state agencies, subdivisions, and interlocal
agencies that are or may be socially or economically impacted, directly or
indirectly, by mineral resource development for:
(i)  planning;
(ii)  construction and maintenance of public facilities; and
(iii)  provision of public services;
(b)  establish the criteria by which the loans and grants will be made;
(c)  determine the order in which projects will be funded;
(d)  in conjunction with other agencies of the state or of subdivisions or of
interlocal agencies, conduct studies, investigations, and research into the
effects of proposed mineral resource development projects upon local
communities;
(e)  sue and be sued in accordance with applicable law;
(f)  qualify for, accept, and administer grants, gifts, loans, or other funds
from the federal government and from other sources, public or private; and
(g)  perform other duties assigned to it under Sections 11-13-306 and
11-13-307.
(2)  Money, including all loan repayments and interest, in the impact fund
derived from bonus payments may be used for any of the purposes set forth in
Subsection (1)(a) but may only be given in the form of loans to be paid back
into the impact fund by the agency, subdivision, or interlocal agency.
(3)  The average annual return to the impact fund on all bonus money may not
be less than 1/2 of the average interest rate paid by the state on general
obligation bonds issued during the most recent fiscal year in which bonds were
sold.
(4) (a)  "Provision of public services" under Subsection (1)(a) includes
contracts with public postsecondary institutions to fund research, education,
or public service programs that benefit impacted counties or political
subdivisions of the counties.
(b)  Each contract under Subsection (4)(a) shall be:
(i)  based on an application to the impact board from the impacted county; and
(ii)  approved by the county legislative body.
(c)  For purposes of this section, a land use plan is a public service
program.
